Massachusetts, session 194th, S976.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(H) The executive office shall conduct background checks on all applicants aged 18 and
older before admission into the Emergency Housing Assistance Program.
(a) Background checks shall include: (1) State and federal criminal history checks; (2)
Sex offender registry checks; (3) Verification of outstanding warrants or pending criminal
charges.
(b) The executive office shall coordinate with the department of criminal justice
information services, U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation to verify background information and immigration status.
(c) Applicants with pending charges or convictions for violent crimes, drug trafficking, or
sex offenses shall be ineligible for program participation.
of 2

(d) The executive office shall promulgate regulations to implement and enforce this
subsection.
of 2